Arkansas, session 2025, HB1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-76-308(d), concerning a proposed brine
expansion unit, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(3)(A) The operator of a brine production unit or brine
expansion unit may apply to the commission to reduce the size of the unit by
removing one (1) or more contiguous tracts from the unit.
(B) The commission may approve the operator’s application
if the commission finds that:
(i) The tract or tracts sought to be removed do not
contain an unplugged brine production or brine disposal well;
(ii) There have been no brine production wells or
brine disposal wells located within one-half (1/2 mi.) mile of any exterior
boundary of the removed tract or tracts during the time the brine production
unit has been in operation; and
(iii) The removed tract or tracts will not be
drained or placed in imminent risk of being drained by the operations of the
*CRH123*
02-20-2025 11:03:32 CRH123

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 HB1413
unit from which the tract or tracts will be removed or by any other adjacent
unit.
(4)(A) The operator or operators of two (2) adjacent brine
production units or brine expansion units may apply to the commission to
transfer one (1) or more contiguous tracts from the unit to the adjacent
unit.
(B) The commission shall approve the operator’s
application if it finds that the:
(i) Operator has the right to produce brine from no
less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the entire area of each immediately
adjacent unit;
(ii) Operation of the brine production unit
receiving the transferred tract or tracts will be expanded, enhanced, or made
more efficient by the proposed transfer;
(iii) Transfer will drain efficiently the area
within the tract or tracts so transferred; and
(iv) Transfer will have no adverse impact on either
the amount or the reasonably anticipated longevity of the royalty payments
due to the owners of the tract or tracts so transferred and will not
otherwise substantially impair the correlative rights of the owners of the
tract or tracts transferred or of owners within the brine unit receiving the
transferred tract.
(5) Upon the commission’s approval of the transfer, the
transferred tract or tracts shall become a brine expansion unit adjacent to
the unit to which it was transferred.

/s/M. Shepherd









02-20-2025 11:03:32 CRH123